California statutes. Business and Professions Code
(2) Under circumstances where the uniform cost of the alcoholic beverages is included in the price of the overnight transient occupancy accommodation, whether or not separately stated.

(3) Beer and wine in sealed containers to the licensee’s transient guests and their invitees from a
 food sale area, as defined in subdivision (c), located within the lodging establishment itself.

(b) For purposes of this division, a “restricted service lodging establishment” is a hotel or motel, within the meaning of subdivision (f) of Section 23355.2, which meets all of the following conditions:

(1) It does not operate a bona fide eating place or other public premise.

(2) It has at least 10 guestroom accommodations.

(3) It does not derive more than 5 percent of its total gross annual revenues from sales of alcoholic beverages.

(c) “Food sale area” means a food facility, within the meaning of Section 113789 of the Health and Safety Code, that routinely offers for sale, throughout the
 area’s normal hours of operation each day to all of the lodging establishment’s transient guests and their invitees, primarily items like prepackaged sandwiches, salads, snacks, candy, dairy products, water, soft drinks, and other nonalcoholic beverages in bottles or cans, and similar food items. The “food sale area” may also offer for sale various items such as health and beauty aids, cosmetics, nonprescription drugs, film, batteries, and similar sundries.

(d) A premises licensed pursuant to this section shall not be authorized to sell or furnish alcoholic beverages to the general public, shall not be entitled to a caterer’s permit pursuant to Section 23399, and shall not be entitled to exercise any off-sale privileges pursuant to Section 23401. The provisions of Article 2 (commencing with Section 23815) of Chapter 5 do not apply to the issuance of on-sale general licenses for restricted service lodging establishments. An on-sale general
 restricted service lodging establishment license may be transferred to another person but not to another location. A licensee specified in this section shall purchase no alcoholic beverages for sale in this state other than from a wholesaler or winegrower licensee.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 29, Sec. 22.   (SB 82)   Effective June 27, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

23396.2.

(a) An on-sale general license for a wine, food and art cultural museum, and educational center and an on-sale general license for a wine and food cultural museum and educational center authorizes those persons described in subdivision (b) to sell, furnish, or give alcoholic beverages for consumption on the premises and off-sale privileges, as further qualified herein.

(b) (1) For purposes of this division, “a wine, food and art cultural museum, and educational center” is a person that meets all the following conditions:

(A) The retail premises shall include an auditorium, concert terrace, exhibition gallery, teaching kitchen, and library and may be adjacent to a bona fide
 eating place as defined in Section 23038.

(B) The premises is located in the County of Napa, operated by a nonprofit entity that is exempt from payment of income taxes as an organization described in Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code, and includes real estate improvements of a value of at least forty-five million dollars ($45,000,000).

(2) For purposes of this division, “a wine and food cultural museum and educational center” is a person that meets all the following conditions:

(A) The retail premises shall include an auditorium, exhibition gallery, teaching kitchen, and library and may be adjacent to a bona fide eating place as defined in Section 23038.

(B) The premises is located in the County of Sonoma, operated by a nonprofit entity
 that is exempt from payment of income taxes as an organization described in Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code, and includes real estate improvements of a value of at least ten million dollars ($10,000,000).

(c) (1) The department shall upon request and qualification issue a licensee located in the County of Napa a duplicate of the original license for a premises located on commonly owned property contiguous to, or in close proximity to the original licensed premises. As used in this section, “close proximity” shall mean the original licensed premises is no further than 900 feet from the premises issued the duplicate license regardless of whether the two premises are separated by a public or private street, alley, or sidewalk.

(2) The department shall upon request and qualification issue a licensee located in the County of Sonoma a duplicate of
 the original license for a premises located on commonly owned, leased, or managed property contiguous to, or in close proximity to the original licensed premises. As used in this section, “close proximity” shall mean the original licensed premises is no further than 900 feet from the premises issued the duplicate license regardless of whether the two premises are separated by a public or private street, alley, or sidewalk.

(d) There shall be no limit as to the number of events held on a licensed premises or duplicate premises at which a person or persons issued caterer’s permits under Section 23399 may sell alcoholic beverages so long as the on-sale general licensee surrenders its license privileges for any portion of the premises at which a catered event is held for the duration of the event.

(e) A licensee licensed under this section shall not be included in the definition of
 “public premises” under Section 23039.

(f) The provisions of Article 2 (commencing with Section 23815) of Chapter 5 do not apply to the issuance of a license issued pursuant to this section. A license issued pursuant to this section may be transferred to another person, qualified pursuant to subdivision (b), but not to another location. A licensee specified in this section shall purchase no alcoholic beverages for sale in this state other than from a wholesaler or winegrower licensee. Notwithstanding any other provision of this division, licensees may donate wine to a person licensed under this section.

(g) Notwithstanding any other provision of this division, a manufacturer, winegrower, manufacturer’s agent, California winegrower’s agent, rectifier, distiller, bottler, or the holder of an importer’s general license may hold the ownership of any interest, directly or indirectly,
 in the premises and in the license issued pursuant to this section, may serve as an officer, director, employee, or agent of that licensee, and may sponsor or fund educational programs, special fundraising and promotional events, improvements in capital projects, and the development of exhibits or facilities of and for that licensee provided the number of items of beer, wine, or distilled spirits by brand, exclusive of wine labeled for the licensee authorized in subdivision (a) of this section, offered for sale by the licensee, which are produced, bottled, rectified, distilled, processed, imported, or sold by an individual licensee holding an interest in, serving as an officer, director, employee or agent of, or sponsoring or funding the programs and projects of the retail licensee, does not exceed 15 percent of the total items of beer, wine, or distilled spirits by brand listed and offered for sale in the retail licensed premises.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 29, Sec. 23.   (SB 82)   Effective June 27, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

23396.3.

(a) (1) A brewpub-restaurant license is a retail license which may be issued to a bona fide public eating place, as defined in Section 23038. The licensed premises shall have a minimum seven-barrel commercial brewing system located permanently onsite that is capable of producing at least seven barrels of beer per brewing cycle, and the licensee shall produce not less than 100 barrels nor more than 5,000 barrels of beer annually on the licensed premises. The license authorizes the sale of beer, wine, and distilled spirits for consumption on the premises, and the sale of beer produced by the brewpub-restaurant
 licensee for consumption on the premises. The license also authorizes the sale of beer produced by the licensed brewpub-restaurant licensee to a licensed beer and wine wholesaler, subject to the requirements of Chapter 12 (commencing with Section 25000). A brewpub-restaurant license does not authorize any of the following:

(A) The sale, furnishing, or exchange of any alcoholic beverages with any other brewpub-restaurant licensee, any licensed beer manufacturer that is under common ownership or control of the brewpub-restaurant licenseholder, regardless of any other licenses held by the licensed beer manufacturer, or any retail licensee in California.

(B) The sale, furnishing, or exchange of any beer produced on the licensed premises bearing the same trademark as any beer
 produced by a licensed beer manufacturer.

(C) A brewpub-restaurant licensee to engage a licensed beer manufacturer to produce beer for sale by the brewpub-restaurant licensee.

(2) Beer produced on the premises shall be offered for sale to consumers for consumption on the premises or off-premises in a bona fide manner. In determining whether the licensee is offering beer produced on the premises for sale in a bona fide manner, the department may consider, without limitation, whether, and the extent to which, the licensee actually sells beer manufactured on the licensed premises to consumers.

(b) A brewpub-restaurant licensee shall purchase all beer, wine, or distilled spirits for sale on the licensed premises from a licensed wholesaler or winegrower, except for the beer produced by the brewpub-restaurant licensee on
 the licensed premises.

(c) Notwithstanding any other law, a brewpub-restaurant licensee may label, bottle, package, or refill any container with beer produced on the licensed premises and may, at the licensed premises, sell beer produced and packaged by the licensee to consumers for consumption off the premises.

(d) A brewpub-restaurant licensee may donate or sell beer produced by the licensee to a nonprofit charitable corporation or association or a nonprofit incorporated trade association pursuant to subdivisions (a) and (b) of Section 25503.9, provided that beer donated pursuant to this section shall not count in the calculation of minimum amounts of beer required to be manufactured and sold pursuant to subdivision (a).

(e) A brewpub-restaurant licensee shall offer for sale on the licensed premises canned,
 bottled, or draft beer commercially available from licensed wholesalers.

(f) The fee to transfer a brewpub-restaurant license shall be the same as for an on-sale general license.

(g) An existing brewpub-restaurant license or a brewpub license issued pursuant to an application filed with the department prior to December 31, 2019, shall not be sold or transferred for a price greater than the original license fee paid by the seller or transferor.

(h) (1) The limitations provided in Section 23816 on the number of licensed premises shall not apply to a brewpub-restaurant license application submitted to the department prior to December 31, 2019.

(2) The limitations provided in Section 23816 on the number of licensed premises shall apply
 to a brewpub-restaurant license application submitted to the department on or after December 31, 2019.

(i) The licensee shall maintain records on a monthly or quarterly basis that are adequate to establish compliance with this section and to enable the department to identify which beer sold by a licensee was produced on the premises in order to establish the licensee’s compliance with subdivisions (a) and (b). These records shall be maintained for a period of at least three years and shall be provided to the department within 30 days of receipt of the department’s written request.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 362, Sec. 1.   (SB 21)   Effective September 27, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

23396.5.

Notwithstanding any other law, any on-sale licensee that maintains a bona fide eating place in conjunction with such license, any on-sale beer and wine public premises licensee, or any winegrower that is exercising a privilege pursuant to Section 23358 or 23390 may allow any person who has purchased and partially consumed a bottle of wine to remove the partially consumed bottle from the premises upon
 departure.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 535, Sec. 2.   (AB 1470)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

23396.6.

(a) The department may issue to the holder of an off-sale retail license an instructional tasting license at the premises of the off-sale retail license. An instructional tasting license shall not be issued to any of the following:

(1) Off-sale licensees at locations where motor vehicle fuel is sold, unless the licensee operates a fully enclosed off-sale retail area encompassing at least 10,000 square feet.

(2) Off-sale licensees at locations with a total of less than 5,000 square feet of interior retail space, unless the calendar quarterly gross sales of alcoholic beverages at the licensed location comprise at least 75 percent of the total gross sales of all products sold at the licensed premises. A
 licenseholder that is issued an instructional tasting license pursuant to this paragraph shall maintain records that separately reflect the gross sales of alcoholic beverages and the gross sales of all other products sold on the licensed premises.

(b) The provisions of Article 2 (commencing with Section 23815) of Chapter 5 and Section 23958.4 shall not apply to the issuance of an instructional tasting license, except that the department may expressly deny the issuance of an instructional tasting license for any premises located in an area of undue concentration of licenses as defined in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 23958.4. Notwithstanding paragraph (3) of subdivision (c), the provisions of Article 2 (commencing with Section 23985) and Article 3 (commencing with Section 24011) of Chapter 6 shall apply to the issuance of an instructional tasting license.

(c) Notwithstanding subdivision (a) of Section 23386 and paragraph (3) of subdivision (c) of Section 25612.5, an instructional tasting license authorizes the licenseholder to allow an authorized licensee or the designated representative of an authorized licensee, to conduct an instructional tasting event at which tastes of alcoholic beverages may be served to consumers subject to the following limitations, and the limitations set forth in Section 25503.56:

(1) (A) At all times during an instructional tasting event, the instructional tasting event area shall be separated from the remainder of the off-sale licensed premises by a wall, rope, cable, cord, chain, fence, or other permanent or temporary barrier. The licenseholder shall prominently display signage prohibiting persons under 21 years of age from entering the instructional tasting event area.

(B) A licenseholder that permits a person under 21 years of age to enter and remain in the instructional tasting event area during an instructional tasting event is guilty of a misdemeanor. Any person under 21 years of age who enters and remains in the instructional tasting event area during an instructional tasting event is guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be punished by a fine of not less than two hundred dollars ($200), no part of which shall be suspended.

(C) The licenseholder shall not permit any consumer to leave the instructional tasting area with an open container of alcohol.

(2) The instructional tasting license shall not authorize the licenseholder to conduct any on-sale retail sales to consumers attending the instructional tasting event.

(3) Unless otherwise restricted, an instructional
 tasting event may take place between the hours of 10 a.m. and 9 p.m.

(d) Unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions set forth in Section 25503.56 govern the construction of this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 29, Sec. 25.   (SB 82)   Effective June 27, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

23397.

Alcoholic beverages may be served on trains, boats, and airplanes under onsale licenses issued for trains, boats, and airplanes, only to passengers or employees not on duty.

Beer may be served on boats under an onsale beer license for fishing party boats except during the time such boats are at a dock.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1963, Ch. 1218.)
-------------------------------------------

23398.

Nothing in this division prevents the purchase or possession in packages of less than one-half pint capacity of bitters or other aromatic or flavoring or medicinal preparations, which are classed for taxing purposes as distilled spirits, by on-sale licensees.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 152.)
-------------------------------------------

23398.5.

Any on-sale license, issued pursuant to this division that authorizes the sale of wine, also authorizes the sale of all of the following:

(a) Soju, an imported Korean alcoholic beverage that contains not more than 24 percent of alcohol by volume and is derived from agricultural products.

(b) Shochu, an imported Japanese alcoholic beverage that contains not more than 24 percent of alcohol by volume and is derived from agricultural products.

(c) Domestically produced soju and shochu, alcoholic beverages that contain not more than 24 percent of alcohol by volume and are derived from agricultural products.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 306, Sec. 1.   (AB 2069)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

23398.7.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of this division, alcoholic beverage sales may occur between 2 a.m. and 4 a.m. upon the on-sale licensed premises operated in a fully enclosed arena with a seating capacity of at least 18,000 seats located in the City of Inglewood if the requirements described in Section 25631.5 are satisfied, including that a permit is issued by the department to the licensee authorizing that activity.

(b) (1) The initial, nonrefundable fee for a permit issued pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be two thousand dollars ($2,000).

(2) The annual fee to renew a permit issued pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be one thousand five hundred
 dollars ($1,500).

(c) The fees collected by the department pursuant to this section shall be deposited into the Alcohol Beverage Control Fund.

(d) The department may adopt rules as it determines to be necessary for the administration of this section.

(e) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2030, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 977, Sec. 1.   (AB 3206)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Repealed as of January 1, 2030, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

23399.

(a) An on-sale general license authorizes the sale of beer, wine, and distilled spirits for consumption on the premises where sold. Any licensee under an on-sale general license, an on-sale beer and wine license, a club license, or a veterans’ club license may apply to the department for a caterer’s permit. A caterer’s permit under an on-sale general license shall authorize the sale of beer, wine, and distilled spirits for consumption at conventions, sporting events, trade exhibits, picnics, social gatherings, or similar events held any place in the state approved by the department. A caterer’s permit under an on-sale beer and wine license shall authorize the sale of beer and wine for consumption at conventions, sporting events, trade exhibits, picnics,
 social gatherings, or similar events held any place in the state approved by the department. A caterer’s permit under a club license or a veterans’ club license shall authorize sales at these events only upon the licensed club premises.

(b) Any licensee under an on-sale general license or an on-sale beer and wine license may apply to the department for an event permit. An event permit under an on-sale general license or an on-sale beer and wine license shall authorize, at events held no more frequently than four days in any single calendar year, the sale of beer, wine, and distilled spirits only under an on-sale general license or beer and wine only under an on-sale beer and wine license for consumption on property adjacent to the licensed premises and owned or under the control of the licensee. This property shall be secured and controlled
 by the licensee and not visible to the general public.

(c) (1) This section shall in no way limit the power of the department to issue special licenses under the provisions of Section 24045 or to issue daily on-sale general licenses under the provisions of Section 24045.1. Consent for sales at each event shall be first obtained from the department in the form of a catering or event authorization issued pursuant to rules prescribed by it. Any event authorization shall be subject to approval by the appropriate local law enforcement agency. The daily fee for each catering or event authorization shall be based on the estimated attendance at each day of the event, as follows:

(A) One hundred dollars ($100) when anticipated attendance is less than 1,000
 people.

(B) Three hundred twenty-five dollars ($325) when anticipated attendance is at least 1,000 people and less than 5,000 people.

(C) One thousand dollars ($1,000) when anticipated attendance is 5,000 people or more.

(2) All fees collected pursuant to this section shall be deposited in the Alcohol Beverage Control Fund as provided in Section 25761.

(d) At all approved events, the licensee may exercise only those privileges authorized by the licensee’s license and shall comply with all provisions of the act pertaining to the conduct of on-sale premises and violation of those provisions may be grounds for suspension or revocation of the licensee’s license or
 permit, or both, as though the violation occurred on the licensed premises.

(e) The fee for a caterer’s permit for a licensee under an on-sale general license, a caterer’s permit for a licensee under an on-sale beer and wine license, or an event permit for a licensee under an on-sale general license or an on-sale beer and wine license shall be the annual fee as specified in subdivision (b) of Section 23320, and the fee for a caterer’s permit for a licensee under a club license or a veterans’ club license shall be as specified in Section 23320, and the permit may be renewable annually at the same time as the licensee’s license. A caterer’s or event permit shall be transferable as a part of the license.

(f) A catering authorization shall not be issued for use at any one premises
 for more than 36 events in one calendar year, except when the department determines additional events may be catered to satisfy substantial public demand.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 656, Sec. 2.   (SB 314)   Effective October 8, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

23399.01.

(a) (1) A beer manufacturer licensee may apply to the department for a beer caterer’s permit. A caterer’s permit issued to a beer manufacturer licensee shall authorize the sale of up to 124 gallons of beer manufactured by or for the licensee per catering event for consumption at conventions, sporting events, trade exhibits, picnics, social gatherings, community events, or similar events held any place in the state approved by the department.
 A beer caterer’s permit does not grant any off-sale privileges and beer sold under a beer caterer’s permit shall not be removed from the premises of a beer catering authorization.

(2) A licensee shall maintain records of all beer sales conducted under a beer caterer’s permit for a minimum of 3 years.

(b) For each catering event, consent for the sale of beer shall be first obtained by the licensee from the department in the form of a beer catering authorization from the department. A beer catering authorization shall be subject to approval by the appropriate local law enforcement agency. The fee for each beer catering authorization shall be based on the estimated attendance on each day of the event and shall
 be the same as the event authorization fee specified in Section 23399.

(1) The department may approve a beer catering authorization in the same manner as it does for catering authorizations issued pursuant to Section 23399. The department shall not approve more than
 two beer catering authorizations for the same day at the same catering event.

(2) A beer catering authorization shall not be issued for more than 36 events per licensee in one calendar year.

(c) The annual fee for a beer caterer’s permit shall be the annual fee as specified in subdivision (b) of Section 23320. The permit may be renewed annually at the same time as the licensee’s license. A beer caterer’s permit shall be transferable as a part of the license.

(d) At all approved events, the licensee may exercise only those privileges authorized by the licensee’s license and shall comply with all provisions of the act pertaining to the conduct of the beer manufacturer
 license. A violation of those provisions may be grounds for suspension or revocation of the licensee’s license or permit, or both, as though the violation occurred on the licensed premises.

(e) All fees collected pursuant to this section shall be deposited in the Alcohol Beverage Control Fund as provided in Section 25761.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 308, Sec. 2.   (AB 2174)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

23399.03.

(a) A winegrower licensee may apply to the department for an estate tasting event permit. If approved by the department, the permit issued to the winegrower licensee shall authorize the winegrower to exercise its tasting room privileges for wine manufactured by or for the winegrower on both of the following:

(1) Property adjacent to the licensed premises and owned by or under the control of the licensee.

(2) A
 nonadjacent vineyard that is owned by or under control of the licensee.

(b) Approval of the permit shall grant the licensee all of the same privileges allowed under their license for the duration of the estate tasting event.

(c) For each tasting event, consent shall be first obtained by the licensee from the department in the form of an estate tasting event authorization from the department. The fee for each estate tasting event authorization shall be one hundred dollars ($100).

(1) The department may approve an estate tasting event authorization in the same manner as it does for catering authorizations issued
 pursuant to Section 23399.

(2) An estate tasting event authorization shall not be issued for more than 36 events per licensee in one calendar year.

(d) The annual fee for an estate tasting event permit shall be the annual fee as specified in subdivision (b) of Section 23320. The permit may be renewed annually at the same time as the licensee’s license. An estate tasting event permit shall be transferable as a part of the license.

(e) At all approved events, the licensee may exercise only those privileges authorized by the licensee’s license and shall comply with all provisions of the act pertaining to the conduct of the winegrower license. A violation of those provisions may be grounds for suspension or revocation of the
 licensee’s license or permit, or both, as though the violation occurred on the licensed premises.

(f) All fees collected pursuant to this section shall be deposited in the Alcohol Beverage Control Fund as provided in Section 25761.

(g) An estate tasting event authorization does not relieve an applicant of review and approval by the appropriate local city, county, or city and county for any other permit necessary prior to the event but subsequent to approval by the department to host the event, including, but not limited to, a local requirement to obtain approval by the local fire marshal or local fire code official. If the local city, county, or city and county requires approval but does not grant it, the authorization granted by the department pursuant to
 subdivision (c) becomes void and is nonrefundable.

(h) Nothing in this section is intended to alter, diminish, replace, or eliminate the authority of a county, city, or city and county from exercising land use regulatory authority by law to the extent the authority may restrict, but not eliminate, privileges afforded by this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 562, Sec. 3.   (AB 720)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

23399.1.

No license or permit shall be required for the serving and otherwise disposing of alcoholic beverages where all of the following conditions prevail:

1. That there is no sale of an alcoholic beverage.

2. That the premises are not open to the general public during the time alcoholic beverages are served, consumed or otherwise disposed of.

3. That the premises are not maintained for the purpose of keeping, serving, consuming or otherwise disposing of alcoholic beverages.

Provided, however, that nothing in this section shall be construed to permit any person to violate any provision of the Alcoholic Beverage Control Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1801.)
-------------------------------------------

23399.2.

Premises for which a special onsale general license is issued may be operated only as a club by an organization which meets all the requirements of Section 23037, or by an organization which meets all of such requirements except that it is operated for pecuniary gain, or its property is not owned by its members, or both.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 1914.)
-------------------------------------------

23399.3.

(a) An on-sale special beer and wine license for hospitals, convalescent homes, and rest homes, authorizes the sale or service of beer and wine purchased from a licensed winegrower or beer and wine wholesaler only to patients or residents of the licensed hospital, convalescent home, or rest home. Such a license shall not be transferable from person to person and no off-sale privileges shall be exercised under such a license. Nothing in this section shall be construed to require a license for the service of beer and wine purchased at retail. 

(b) As used in this section,
 “rest home” includes an apartment building, whether licensed or unlicensed, which rents exclusively to persons age 62 and older, and provides one to three meals daily for tenants.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 701, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

23399.4.

(a) A licensed winegrower may apply to the department for a certified farmers’ market sales permit. A certified farmers’ market sales permit shall authorize the licensee, a member of the licensee’s family, or an employee of the licensee to sell wine at a certified farmers’ market at any place in the state approved by the department. The licensee may only sell wine that is produced entirely from grapes or other agricultural products grown by the winegrower and that is bottled by the winegrower. In addition, the permit will allow an instructional tasting event by the licensee on the subject of wine at a certified farmers’ market. The permit may be issued for up to 12 months but shall not be valid for more than one day a week at any single specified certified farmers’ market location. A winegrower may hold more than one certified
 farmers’ market sales permit. The department shall notify the city, county, or city and county and applicable law enforcement agency where the certified farmers’ market is to be held of the issuance of the permit. A “certified farmers’ market” means a location operated in accordance with Chapter 10.5 (commencing with Section 47000) of Division 17 of the Food and Agricultural Code, and the regulations adopted pursuant thereto.

(b) (1) An instructional tasting event is subject to the authorization and managerial control of the operator of the certified farmers’ market. The licensee, a member of the licensee’s family, or an employee of the licensee may conduct an instructional tasting event for consumers on the subject of wine at a certified farmers’ market.

(2) (A) At all times during an instructional tasting event, the instructional
 tasting event area shall be separated from the remainder of the market by a wall, rope, cable, cord, chain, fence, or other permanent or temporary barrier. Only one licensee may conduct an instructional tasting event during the operational hours of any one certified farmers’ market.

(B) The licensee shall not permit any consumer to leave the instructional tasting area with an open container of wine.

(c) The licensee shall not pour more than three ounces of wine per person per day.

(d) The licensed winegrower eligible for the certified farmers’ market sales permit shall not sell more than 5,000 gallons of wine annually pursuant to all certified farmers’ market sales permits held by any single winegrower. The licensed winegrower shall report total certified farmers’ market wine sales to the department on an annual
 basis. The report may be included within the annual report of production submitted to the department, or pursuant to any regulation as may be prescribed by the department.

(e) Except as otherwise provided in this division or by the rules of the department, no premium, gift, free goods, or other thing of value shall be given away by the licensee, a member of the licensee’s family, or an employee of the licensee in connection with an instructional tasting event conducted pursuant to this section that includes tastings of wine.

(f) The fee for any permit issued pursuant to this section shall be the annual fee as specified in subdivision (b) of Section 23320.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 29, Sec. 27.   (SB 82)   Effective June 27, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

23399.45.

(a) For the purposes of this section:

(1) “Certified farmers’ market” means a location operated in accordance with Chapter 10.5 (commencing with Section 47000) of Division 17 of the Food and Agricultural Code.

(2) “Community event” means an event as defined by Section 113755 of the Health and Safety Code.

(b) (1) A licensed beer manufacturer may apply to the department for a certified farmers’ market beer sales permit. Subject to the requirements of Chapter 10.5 (commencing with Section 47000) of Division 17 of the Food and Agricultural Code, and to the discretion and managerial control of a certified farmers’
 market or community event operator, respectively, a certified farmers’ market beer sales permit shall authorize the licensee, a member of the licensee’s family who is 21 years of age or older, or an employee of the licensee to sell packaged beer that has been manufactured by a beer manufacturer applying for the permit at a certified farmers’ market, including any permitted community event area adjacent to, and operated in conjunction with, a certified farmers’ market, located within the county or an adjacent county of the physical location of the licensed beer manufacturer.

(2) (A) A certified farmers’ market beer sales permit shall also authorize an instructional tasting event on the subject of beer at a certified farmers’ market, including any permitted community event area adjacent to, and operated in conjunction with, a certified farmers’ market, located within the county or an adjacent county of the physical location
 of the licensed beer manufacturer.

(B) An instructional tasting event is subject to the authorization and managerial control of the applicable operator of the certified farmers’ market or community event. The licensee, a member of the licensee’s family who is 21 years of age or older, or an employee of the licensee may conduct the instructional tasting event.

(C) At all times during an instructional tasting event, the instructional tasting event area shall be separated from the remainder of the market or community event by a wall, rope, cable, cord, chain, fence, or other permanent or temporary barrier.

(D) Only one licensed beer manufacturer may conduct an instructional tasting event during the operational hours of any one certified farmers’ market or community event. The licensee shall not pour more than eight
 ounces of beer per person per day.

(E) The licensee shall not permit any consumer to leave the instructional tasting area with an open container of beer.

(c) Sales under the certified farmers’ market beer sales permit shall only occur at a certified farmers’ market or within a permitted community event area adjacent to, and operated in conjunction with, the certified farmers’ market that is located within the same county or adjacent county of the location of the licensed beer manufacturer’s manufacturing facility. The permit may be issued for up to 12 months but shall not be valid for more than one day a week at any single specified certified farmers’ market or community event location. A beer manufacturer may hold more than one permit. The department shall notify the city, county, or city and county and the applicable law enforcement agency where the certified farmers’ market or
 permitted community event is to be held of the issuance of the permit.

(d) The licensed beer manufacturer eligible for the certified farmers’ market beer sales permit shall not sell more than 5,000 gallons of beer annually pursuant to all certified farmers’ market beer sales permits held by any single beer manufacturer. The licensed beer manufacturer shall maintain records of annual beer sales made pursuant to all certified farmers’ market beer sales permits issued.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 29, Sec. 28.   (SB 82)   Effective June 27, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

23399.5.

(a) (1) A license or permit is not required for the serving of alcoholic beverages in a limousine by any person operating a limousine service regulated by the Public Utilities Commission, provided there is no extra charge or fee for the alcoholic beverages.

(2) For purposes of this subdivision, there is no extra charge or fee for the alcoholic beverages when the fee charged for the limousine service is the same regardless of whether alcoholic beverages are served.

(b) (1) A license or permit is not required for the serving of alcoholic beverages as part of a hot air balloon ride service, provided there is no extra charge or fee for the alcoholic
 beverages.

(2) For purposes of this subdivision, there is no extra charge or fee for the alcoholic beverages when the fee charged for the hot air balloon ride service is the same regardless of whether alcoholic beverages are served.

(c) A license or permit is not required for the serving of wine or beer as part of any service provided by an establishment that is subject to regulation by the State Board of Barbering and Cosmetology under the Barbering and Cosmetology Act (Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 7301) of Division 3) if the following requirements are met:

(1) There is no extra charge or fee for the beer or wine. For purposes of this paragraph, there is no extra charge or fee for the beer or wine if the fee charged for the service is the same regardless of whether beer or wine is served.

(2) The license of the establishment providing the service is in good standing with the State Board of Barbering and Cosmetology.

(3) No more than 12 ounces of beer or 6 ounces of wine by the glass is offered to a client.

(4) The beer or wine is provided only during business hours and in no case later than 10 p.m.
